dev/variation/scn2ipa.lexc
LEXICON Root

Chars ;

LEXICON Loop

Chars ; 
# ;

LEXICON Chars 

a:a Loop ;
á:a Loop ;
à:a Loop ;
â:a Loop ;
b:b Loop ;
c:c Loop ;
ç:ç Loop ;
d:d Loop ;
đ:đ Loop ;
ḍ:ḍ Loop ;
e:e Loop ;
é:e Loop ;
è:e Loop ;
ê:e Loop ;
f:f Loop ;
g:g Loop ;
h:h Loop ;
i:i Loop ;
í:i Loop ;
ì:i Loop ;
î:i Loop ;
j:j Loop ;
k:k Loop ;
l:l Loop ;
m:m Loop ;
n:n Loop ;
o:o Loop ;
ó:o Loop ;
ò:o Loop ;
ô:o Loop ;
p:p Loop ;
q:q Loop ;
r:r Loop ;
s:s Loop ;
š:š Loop ;
t:t Loop ;
u:u Loop ;
ú:u Loop ;
ù:u Loop ;
û:u Loop ;
v:v Loop ;
x:x Loop ;
y:y Loop ;
z:z Loop ;
